Maine, session 132, LD301.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §307, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. General increase in rates; rate-adjustment mechanisms; quantitative metrics.
The commission may establish or authorize rate-adjustment mechanisms or quantitative
metrics pertaining to a public utility's operations and activities in a proceeding for a general
increase in rates.
Page 1 - 132LR0555(03)